North Dakota, session 69, SB2228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE - RURAL GROCERY STORE
SUSTAINABILITY GRANTS - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the
general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $1,000,000, or so much of the
sum as may be necessary, to the department of commerce for the purpose of providing grants for the
preservation of rural grocery stores and increasing the availability of food access in the state, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The department shall prioritize grant
funding awarded under this section for supporting existing rural grocery stores before awarding grant
funding for feasibility costs related to reopening a grocery store in a community without a grocery store.
The funding may not be used for food processing or offsite preparation operations of a rural grocery
store. The department of commerce shall establish guidelines for awarding grants under this section.
The appropriation in this section is considered a one-time funding item.

S. B. NO. 2228 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2228.
Senate Vote: Yeas 40 Nays 6 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 75 Nays 17 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State